Louisiana, session 2026, HB332.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 3:264(H) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§264. Louisiana Agricultural Finance Authority
* * *
H. The Authority authority shall meet at least four two, but not more than
twelve, times a year upon call.
* * *
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.